Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1118.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 470(a) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 470. Renewal of Licenses; Temporary Provisions for Licensees in Armed Service.--(a) * * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 (3) A club licensee that, for the preceding renewal period purchased less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) in liquor from the board, may apply for a refund of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for which the licensee paid in license and filing fees. The licensee must file a written application with the board on a form prescribed by the board. The board shall refund the amount of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) to a club licensee upon the receipt of the application and being satisfied of the truth of the statements in the application. The board may not impose a fee for the application.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1118PN1239 - 2 - 123456789101112